Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-303 Examination of producers,
adjusters, promoters, and independent bill reviewers. For the purpose of
ascertaining its condition, or compliance with this code, the commissioner may
as often as the commissioner deems advisable examine the insurance accounts,
records, documents, and transactions of:

(1) Any insurance producer, adjuster, or independent
bill reviewer, including insurance agencies and surplus lines agencies; or

(2) Any person engaged in, proposing to be engaged
in, or assisting in the promotion or formation of a domestic insurer, a stock
corporation to finance a domestic mutual insurer or the production of its
business, or a corporation to be attorney-in-fact for a domestic reciprocal
insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 288, §3; am L 2001, c 216, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next